Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB167.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3101(b) of Title 20 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 3101. Payments to family and funeral directors.* * *(b) Deposit account.--Any bank, savings association, savings and loan association, building and loan association, credit union or other savings organization, at any time after the death of a depositor, member or certificate holder, shall pay the amount on deposit or represented by the certificate, when the total standing to the credit of the decedent in that institution does not exceed [$10,000] $20,000, to the spouse, any child, the father or mother or any sister or brother (preference being 12345678910111213141516171819 given in the order named) of the deceased depositor, member or certificate holder, provided that a receipted funeral bill or an affidavit, executed by a licensed funeral director which sets forth that satisfactory arrangements for payment of funeral services have been made, is presented. Any bank, association, credit union or other savings organization making such a payment shall be released to the same extent as if payment had been made to a duly appointed personal representative of the decedent and it shall not be required to see to the application thereof. Any person to whom payment is made shall be answerable therefor to anyone prejudiced by an improper distribution.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0167PN0125 - 2 - 12345678910111213